Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 5. Enlisted Personnel.

§ 33-7-201.
Enlistment period of service, transfer, discharge, and extensions of enlistment.

The qualifications for enlistment and re-enlistment, the periods of enlistment, re-enlistment and voluntary extension of enlistment, the period of service, the form of oath to be taken, and the manner and form of transfer and discharge of enlisted personnel of the forces of the organized militia shall be those prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and by this chapter and by regulations issued thereunder.

The Governor is authorized to extend the period of any enlistment, re-enlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment, and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the organized militia for a period not to exceed six (6) months after the termination of an emergency declared by him, the legislature or congress.

Whenever the period of enlistment, re-enlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States are extended, the Governor shall extend the period of any enlistment, re-enlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel in the corresponding force of the organized militia for the same period.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-71; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 47, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-203.
Contract and oath of enlistment.

Every person who enlists or reenlists in any force of the organized militia shall sign an enlistment contract and shall take and subscribe such oath or affirmation of enlistment as may be prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and the State of Mississippi and by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter. Such oath shall be taken and subscribed before any commissioned officer; provided, however, that enlisted personnel may also take and subscribe such oath before any warrant officer. A person making a false oath as to any statement contained in such enlistment contract shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of perjury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-72; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 48; Laws, 1981, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-7-205.
Discharge of enlisted men.

An enlisted man discharged from service in the National Guard shall receive a discharge in writing, in such form and with such classifications as is or shall be prescribed under regulations promulgated by the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi or by the secretary of the appropriate federal service.

Discharges may be given prior to the expiration of terms of enlistment under such regulations as may be prescribed by the Adjutant General, State of Mississippi, or pursuant to regulations promulgated by the secretary of the appropriate federal service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-73; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 49, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-207.
Promotion and administrative reduction of enlisted men.

The promotion and administrative reduction of enlisted men, including non-commissioned officers, shall be pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the United States for the government and administration of the National Guard, or pursuant to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-74; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 50, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-209.
Uniform of enlisted men.

Every enlisted man of the Mississippi National Guard shall be furnished with a service uniform.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-75; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 51, eff from and after June 1, 1966.